Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20168-115.01
Banks; new charter; transfer of charter; procedure.

When an application required by section 8-120 is made by a corporation, the following procedures shall be followed:

(1) Except as provided for in subdivision (2) of this section, when application is made for a new bank charter, a public hearing shall be held on each application. Notice of the filing of the application shall be published by the department for three weeks in a legal newspaper published in or of general circulation in the county where the applicant proposes to operate the bank. The date for hearing the application shall be not less than thirty days after the last publication of notice of hearing and not more than ninety days after the application has been accepted for filing by the director as substantially complete unless the applicant agrees to a later date. Notice of the filing of the application shall be sent by the department to all financial institutions located in the county where the applicant proposes to operate;

(2) When application is made for a new bank charter and the director determines, in his or her discretion, that the conditions of subdivision (3) of this section are met, then the public hearing requirement of subdivision (1) of this section shall only be required if, (a) after publishing a notice of the proposed application in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the main office of the applicant is to be located and (b) after giving notice to all financial institutions located within such county, the director receives a substantive objection to the application within fifteen days after the first day of publication;

(3) The director shall consider the following in each application before the public hearing requirement of subdivision (1) of this section may be waived:

(a) Whether the experience, character, and general fitness of the applicant and of the applicant's officers and directors are such as to warrant belief that the applicant will operate the business honestly, fairly, and efficiently;

(b) Whether the length of time that the applicant or a majority of the applicant's officers, directors, and shareholders have been involved in the business of banking in this state has been for a minimum of five consecutive years; and

(c) Whether the condition of financial institutions currently owned by the applicant, the applicant's holding company, if any, or the applicant's officers, directors, or shareholders is such as to indicate that a hearing on the current application would not be necessary;

(4) Except as provided in subdivision (6) of this section, when application is made for transfer of a bank charter and move of the main office of a bank to any location other than within the corporate limits of the city or village of its original charter or, if such bank charter is not located in a city or village, then for transfer outside the county in which it is located, the director shall hold a hearing on the matter if he or she determines, in his or her discretion, that the condition of the applicant warrants a hearing. If the director determines that the condition of the applicant does not warrant a hearing, the director shall (a) publish a notice of the filing of the application in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the proposed main office and charter of the applicant would be located and (b) give notice of such application to all financial institutions located within the county where the proposed main office and charter would be located and to such other interested parties as the director may determine. If the director receives any substantive objection to the proposed relocation within fifteen days after the first day of publication, he or she shall hold a hearing on the application. Notice of a hearing held pursuant to this subdivision shall be published for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the main office would be located. The date for hearing the application shall be not less than thirty days after the last publication of notice of hearing and not more than ninety days after the application has been accepted for filing by the director as substantially complete unless the applicant agrees to a later date. When the persons making application for transfer of a main office and charter are officers or directors of the bank, there is a rebuttable presumption that such persons are parties of integrity and responsibility;

(5) Except as provided in subdivision (6) of this section, when application is made for a move of any bank's main office within the city, village, or county, if not chartered within a city or village, of its original charter, the director shall publish notice of the proposed move in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the main office of the applicant is located and shall give notice of such intended move to all financial institutions located within the county where such bank is located. If the director receives a substantive objection to such move within fifteen days after publishing such notice, he or she shall publish an additional notice and hold a hearing as provided in subdivision (1) of this section;

(6) With the approval of the director, a bank may move its main office and charter to the location of a branch of the bank without public notice or hearing as long as (a) the condition of the bank, in the discretion of the director, does not warrant a hearing and (b) the branch (i) is located in Nebraska, (ii) has been in operation for at least one year as a branch of the bank or was acquired by the bank pursuant to section 8-1506 or 8-1516, and (iii) is simultaneously relocated to the original main office location;

(7) The director shall send any notice to financial institutions required by this section by first-class mail, postage prepaid, or electronic mail. Electronic mail may be used if the financial institution agrees in advance to receive such notices by electronic mail. A financial institution may designate one office for receipt of any such notice if it has more than one office located within the county where such notice is to be sent or a main office in a county other than the county where such notice is to be sent;

(8) The expense of any publication and mailing required by this section shall be paid by the applicant but payment shall not be a condition precedent to approval by the director; and

(9) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, the director shall take immediate action on any charter application or applications concerned without the benefit of a hearing in the case of an emergency so declared by the Governor, the Secretary of State, and the director.

Laws 1965, c. 25, § 1, p. 191;

Laws 1967, c. 19, § 2, p. 117;

Laws 1973, LB 164, § 3;

Laws 1974, LB 721, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 220, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 957, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 217, § 2;

Laws 2005, LB 533, § 2;

Laws 2008, LB851, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB890, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB751, § 1.